language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0354 Y 82
SFX 0354 ćěr hnali ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnata ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnataj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnate ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnateho ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatej ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnateje ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnateju ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatemu ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatoh ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatom ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatu ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaty ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatych ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatym ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatymaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnatymi ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnać ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaća ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaćach ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaćam ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaće ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaćemi ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaći ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaćom ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaćomaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaćow ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnaću ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnał ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnała ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnałe ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnało ...
SFX 0354 ćěr hnałoj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěri ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěrimoj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěrimy ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěritaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěritej ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěriće ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěriš ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěrja ...
SFX 0354 ćěr poćěrju ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěri ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěricy ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrimoj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrimy ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěritaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěritej ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěriće ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěriš ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrja ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjaca ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjace ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjaceho ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacej ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjaceje ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjaceju ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacemu ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjach ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjachmoj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjachmy ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjachu ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacoh ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacom ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacu ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacy ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacych ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacym ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacymaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjacymi ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrješe ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrještaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrještej ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrješće ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrjo ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrju ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrmoj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrmy ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrtaj ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrtej ...
SFX 0354 ćěr ćěrće ...

SFX 0355 Y 7
SFX 0355 ód odach ..
SFX 0355 ód odam ..
SFX 0355 ód odami ..
SFX 0355 ód odom ..
SFX 0355 ód odow ..
SFX 0355 ód ody ..
SFX 0355 ód odźoch ..

SFX 0356 Y 12
SFX 0356 c ca .
SFX 0356 c cach .
SFX 0356 c caj .
SFX 0356 c cam .
SFX 0356 c cami .
SFX 0356 c cej .
SFX 0356 c com .
SFX 0356 c comaj .
SFX 0356 c cow .
SFX 0356 c cu .
SFX 0356 c cy .
SFX 0356 c če .

SFX 0357 Y 9
SFX 0357 ór ora ..
SFX 0357 ór orach ..
SFX 0357 ór oram ..
SFX 0357 ór orami ..
SFX 0357 ór orje ..
SFX 0357 ór oromaj ..
SFX 0357 ór orow ..
SFX 0357 ór oru ..
SFX 0357 ór ory ..

SFX 0358 Y 17
SFX 0358 ši cha ..
SFX 0358 ši chaj ..
SFX 0358 ši che ..
SFX 0358 ši cheho ..
SFX 0358 ši chej ..
SFX 0358 ši cheje ..
SFX 0358 ši cheju ..
SFX 0358 ši chemu ..
SFX 0358 ši chi ..
SFX 0358 ši chich ..
SFX 0358 ši chim ..
SFX 0358 ši chimaj ..
SFX 0358 ši chimi ..
SFX 0358 ši cho ..
SFX 0358 ši choh ..
SFX 0358 ši chom ..
SFX 0358 ši chu ..

SFX 0359 Y 33
SFX 0359 ši cha ..
SFX 0359 ši chaj ..
SFX 0359 ši che ..
SFX 0359 ši cheho ..
SFX 0359 ši chej ..
SFX 0359 ši cheje ..
SFX 0359 ši cheju ..
SFX 0359 ši chemu ..
SFX 0359 ši chi ..
SFX 0359 ši chich ..
SFX 0359 ši chim ..
SFX 0359 ši chimaj ..
SFX 0359 ši chimi ..
SFX 0359 ši cho ..
SFX 0359 ši choh ..
SFX 0359 ši chom ..
SFX 0359 ši chu ..
SFX 0359 ši šiša ..
SFX 0359 ši šiše ..
SFX 0359 ši šišeho ..
SFX 0359 ši šišej ..
SFX 0359 ši šišeje ..
SFX 0359 ši šišeju ..
SFX 0359 ši šišemu ..
SFX 0359 ši šiši ..
SFX 0359 ši šišich ..
SFX 0359 ši šišim ..
SFX 0359 ši šišimaj ..
SFX 0359 ši šišimi ..
SFX 0359 ši šišo ..
SFX 0359 ši šišoh ..
SFX 0359 ši šišom ..
SFX 0359 ši šišu ..

SFX 0360 Y 34
SFX 0360 a aj .
SFX 0360 a e .
SFX 0360 a eho .
SFX 0360 a ej .
SFX 0360 a eje .
SFX 0360 a eju .
SFX 0360 a emu .
SFX 0360 a o .
SFX 0360 a oh .
SFX 0360 a om .
SFX 0360 a u .
SFX 0360 a y .
SFX 0360 a ych .
SFX 0360 a ym .
SFX 0360 a ymaj .
SFX 0360 a ymi .
SFX 0360 a źe .
SFX 0360 a źi .
SFX 0360 a źiša .
SFX 0360 a źiše .
SFX 0360 a źišeho .
SFX 0360 a źišej .
SFX 0360 a źišeje .
SFX 0360 a źišeju .
SFX 0360 a źišemu .
SFX 0360 a źiši .
SFX 0360 a źišich .
SFX 0360 a źišim .
SFX 0360 a źišimaj .
SFX 0360 a źišimi .
SFX 0360 a źišo .
SFX 0360 a źišoh .
SFX 0360 a źišom .
SFX 0360 a źišu .

SFX 0361 Y 5
SFX 0361 ór orach ..
SFX 0361 ór oram ..
SFX 0361 ór orami ..
SFX 0361 ór orow ..
SFX 0361 ór ory ..

SFX 0362 Y 11
SFX 0362 ósć osća ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćej ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćemi ...
SFX 0362 ósć osći ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćimi ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćo ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćoch ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćom ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćomaj ...
SFX 0362 ósć osćow ...
SFX 0362 ósć osću ...

SFX 0363 Y 12
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźa ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźach ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźam ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźe ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźej ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźemi ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźi ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźo ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźom ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźomaj ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźow ....
SFX 0363 ózdź ozdźu ....

SFX 0364 Y 10
SFX 0364 i ja .
SFX 0364 i jach .
SFX 0364 i jam .
SFX 0364 i je .
SFX 0364 i jej .
SFX 0364 i jemi .
SFX 0364 i jojo .
SFX 0364 i jomaj .
SFX 0364 i jow .
SFX 0364 i ju .

SFX 0365 Y 8
SFX 0365 ada adach ...
SFX 0365 ada adam ...
SFX 0365 ada adami ...
SFX 0365 ada adomaj ...
SFX 0365 ada adow ...
SFX 0365 ada adu ...
SFX 0365 ada ady ...
SFX 0365 ada edźe ...

SFX 0366 Y 13
SFX 0366 och ocha ...
SFX 0366 och ochach ...
SFX 0366 och ochaj ...
SFX 0366 och ocham ...
SFX 0366 och ochami ...
SFX 0366 och ochej ...
SFX 0366 och ochi ...
SFX 0366 och ocho ...
SFX 0366 och ochom ...
SFX 0366 och ochomaj ...
SFX 0366 och ochow ...
SFX 0366 och ochu ...
SFX 0366 och óše ...

SFX 0367 Y 73
SFX 0367 ž zy .
SFX 0367 ž zyli .
SFX 0367 ž zymoj .
SFX 0367 ž zymy .
SFX 0367 ž zytaj .
SFX 0367 ž zytej .
SFX 0367 ž zyć .
SFX 0367 ž zyće .
SFX 0367 ž zył .
SFX 0367 ž zyła .
SFX 0367 ž zyłe .
SFX 0367 ž zyło .
SFX 0367 ž zyłoj .
SFX 0367 ž zyš .
SFX 0367 ž ža .
SFX 0367 ž žaca .
SFX 0367 ž žacaj .
SFX 0367 ž žace .
SFX 0367 ž žaceho .
SFX 0367 ž žacej .
SFX 0367 ž žaceje .
SFX 0367 ž žaceju .
SFX 0367 ž žacemu .
SFX 0367 ž žach .
SFX 0367 ž žachmoj .
SFX 0367 ž žachmy .
SFX 0367 ž žachu .
SFX 0367 ž žacoh .
SFX 0367 ž žacom .
SFX 0367 ž žacu .
SFX 0367 ž žacy .
SFX 0367 ž žacych .
SFX 0367 ž žacym .
SFX 0367 ž žacymaj .
SFX 0367 ž žacymi .
SFX 0367 ž žena .
SFX 0367 ž ženaj .
SFX 0367 ž žene .
SFX 0367 ž ženeho .
SFX 0367 ž ženej .
SFX 0367 ž ženeje .
SFX 0367 ž ženeju .
SFX 0367 ž ženemu .
SFX 0367 ž ženi .
SFX 0367 ž ženja .
SFX 0367 ž ženjach .
SFX 0367 ž ženjam .
SFX 0367 ž ženje .
SFX 0367 ž ženjemi .
SFX 0367 ž ženjom .
SFX 0367 ž ženjomaj .
SFX 0367 ž ženjow .
SFX 0367 ž ženju .
SFX 0367 ž ženoh .
SFX 0367 ž ženom .
SFX 0367 ž ženu .
SFX 0367 ž ženy .
SFX 0367 ž ženych .
SFX 0367 ž ženym .
SFX 0367 ž ženymaj .
SFX 0367 ž ženymi .
SFX 0367 ž žeše .
SFX 0367 ž žeštaj .
SFX 0367 ž žeštej .
SFX 0367 ž žešće .
SFX 0367 ž žicy .
SFX 0367 ž žmoj .
SFX 0367 ž žmy .
SFX 0367 ž žo .
SFX 0367 ž žtaj .
SFX 0367 ž žtej .
SFX 0367 ž žu .
SFX 0367 ž žće .

SFX 0368 Y 34
SFX 0368 na naj ..
SFX 0368 na ne ..
SFX 0368 na neho ..
SFX 0368 na nej ..
SFX 0368 na neje ..
SFX 0368 na neju ..
SFX 0368 na nemu ..
SFX 0368 na ni ..
SFX 0368 na nje ..
SFX 0368 na no ..
SFX 0368 na noh ..
SFX 0368 na nom ..
SFX 0368 na nu ..
SFX 0368 na ny ..
SFX 0368 na nych ..
SFX 0368 na nym ..
SFX 0368 na nymaj ..
SFX 0368 na nymi ..
SFX 0368 na ńša ..
SFX 0368 na ńše ..
SFX 0368 na ńšeho ..
SFX 0368 na ńšej ..
SFX 0368 na ńšeje ..
SFX 0368 na ńšeju ..
SFX 0368 na ńšemu ..
SFX 0368 na ńši ..
SFX 0368 na ńšich ..
SFX 0368 na ńšim ..
SFX 0368 na ńšimaj ..
SFX 0368 na ńšimi ..
SFX 0368 na ńšo ..
SFX 0368 na ńšoh ..
SFX 0368 na ńšom ..
SFX 0368 na ńšu ..

SFX 0369 Y 11
SFX 0369 ta tach ..
SFX 0369 ta taj ..
SFX 0369 ta tam ..
SFX 0369 ta tami ..
SFX 0369 ta tojo ..
SFX 0369 ta tomaj ..
SFX 0369 ta tow ..
SFX 0369 ta tu ..
SFX 0369 ta ty ..
SFX 0369 ta ća ..
SFX 0369 ta će ..
