language-source-bodies/slavic-non-ru-uk-20260705/source-bodies/hsb-upper-sorbian/upper_sorbian_witaj_math_terminology_kuskec_magerowa_catalog_bvs_soblex_package_stiftung_wiki_retry__hsb_DE_soblex_w8_3.09.18.dic
Cefani/0364
Chorwata/0369
Hór/0361
Ili/0364
Sachari/0364
chłódnosuši/0359
drobnoproch/0366
horcosuši/0359
horda/0360
hrabi/0364
hrjada/0365
hroch/0366
hrož/0367
hubjena/0368
hugenota/0369
hód/0355
hólc/0356
hór/0357
hór/0361
hósć/0362
hózdź/0363
kaž/0367
markhrabi/0364
moch/0366
městostarosta/0369
měšćanosta/0369
nalada/0365
narjada/0365
njehrož/0367
njekaž/0367
njeraž/0367
njewobuž/0367
njewož/0367
njećěr/0354
njełaž/0367
połsuši/0358
proch/0366
přechłódnosuši/0358
přehorcosuši/0358
přesuši/0358
raž/0367
rjada/0365
starosta/0369
suši/0358
suši/0359
wjesnjanosta/0369
wobuž/0367
wož/0367
ćiši/0358
łaž/0367
šikwana/0368
